North Carolina, session 2025, HB1236.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT ESTABLISHING JUDICIAL STANDARDS
COMMISSION
SECTION 1.(a) Article IV of the North Carolina Constitution is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"Sec. 23. Judicial Standards Commission.
(1) Membership. The Judicial Standards Commission shall consist of the following
residents of this State:
(a) Five judges appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court as follows:
1. One Court of Appeals judge.
2. Two superior court judges.
3. Two district court judges.
(b) Five licensed attorneys appointed by the officers of the North Carolina State
Bar.
(c) Five citizens who are neither lawyers nor judges, active or retired, appointed
by the Governor.
(2) Public hearings and records. Any disciplinary hearings held before and sanctions
imposed by the Commission as prescribed by law shall be made public."
SECTION 1.(b) The amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the general election to be held on November 3,
2026, which election shall be conducted under the laws then governing elections in the State.
Ballots, voting systems, or both may be used in accordance with Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to add the Judicial Standards Commission to the
Constitution to ensure that complaints against judges and justices are handled in fair, transparent,
*H1236-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and nonpartisan proceedings, and to require that the Commission's disciplinary hearings and
sanctions be made public."
SECTION 1.(c) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under subsection (b) of this section. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are in favor of the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary of
State shall enroll the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of
votes cast on the question are against the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the
amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 1.(d) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under
subsection (c) of this section reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the amendment set out in subsection (a)
of this section is effective upon certification.

AMENDING JUDICIAL STANDARDS COMMISSION STATUTES
SECTION 2. Article 30 of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Article 30.
"Judicial Standards Commission.
"§ 7A-374.1. Purpose.
The purpose of this Article is to provide for the investigation and resolution of inquiries
concerning the qualification or conduct of any judge or justice of the General Court of Justice.
The procedure for discipline of any judge or justice of the General Court of Justice shall be in
accordance with this Article. Article and the North Carolina Constitution, Article IV, Section 23.
Nothing in this Article shall affect the impeachment of judges under the North Carolina
Constitution, Article IV, Sections 4 and 17.
…
"§ 7A-375. Judicial Standards Commission.
(a) Composition. – The Judicial Standards Commission shall consist of the following
residents of North Carolina:
(1) Two Court of Appeals judges, each appointed by the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Court.
(2) Two superior court judges, each appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Court.
(3) Two district court judges, each appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Court.
(4) Four judges appointed by the General Assembly in accordance with
G.S. 120-121, selected as follows:
a. One district court judge recommended by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate.
b. One district court judge recommended by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
c. One superior court judge recommended by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate.
d. One superior court judge recommended by the Speaker of the House
of Representatives.
(5) Four citizens who are not judges, active or retired, two appointed by the
Governor, and two appointed by the General Assembly in accordance with
G.S. 120-121, one upon recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate and one upon recommendation of the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
The General Assembly shall also appoint alternate Commission members for the Commission
members the General Assembly has appointed to serve in the event of scheduling conflicts,
Page 2 House Bill 1236-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
conflicts of interest, disability, or other disqualification arising in a particular case. The alternate
members shall have the same qualifications for appointment as the original members.
…
(b) Vacancies. – A vacancy on the Commission arises upon the resignation or death of a
member or if a member ceases to have the qualifications required for the member's appointment.
Vacancies of members, other than those appointed by the General Assembly, members are filled
in the same manner as the original appointment, for the remainder of the term. Vacancies of
members appointed by the General Assembly are filled by the alternate member appointed
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
In the absence of an alternate member appointed by the General Assembly pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section, or if an alternate member is unable to serve, such vacancy shall be filled as
provided under G.S. 120-122.
(c) Disability or Disqualification. – If a member of the Commission appointed by the
Chief Justice or the officers of the State Bar becomes disabled, or becomes a respondent before
the Commission, the Chief Justice or the officers of the State Bar, respectively, shall appoint an
alternate member to serve during the period of disability or disqualification. The alternate
member shall be from the same division of the General Court of Justice as the judge whose place
the alternate member takes. If a member of the Commission becomes disabled or is disqualified
from participating in a disciplinary proceeding, the Governor, if he appointed the disabled
member, shall appoint, or the State Bar Council, if it elected the disabled member, shall elect,
Governor shall appoint an alternate member to serve during the period of disability or
disqualification. If a member of the Commission who was appointed by the General Assembly
becomes disabled or is disqualified from participating in a disciplinary proceeding, the chair of
the Commission shall call upon the alternate member appointed pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section.
…
"§ 7A-377. Procedures.
…
(a1) Unless otherwise waived by the justice or judge involved, involved and except as
provided herein, all papers filed with and proceedings before the Commission, including any
investigation that the Commission may make, are confidential, and no person shall disclose
information obtained from Commission proceedings or papers filed with or by the Commission,
except as provided herein. Those papers are not subject to disclosure under Chapter 132 of the
General Statutes.
…
(a5) If, after an investigation is completed, the Commission concludes that disciplinary
proceedings should be instituted, the notice and statement of charges filed by the Commission,
along with the answer and all other pleadings, remain confidential. are no longer confidential and
shall be made public. Disciplinary hearings ordered by the Commission are confidential, shall be
held publicly and recommendations of the Commission to the Supreme Court, along with the
record filed in support of such recommendations are confidential. recommendations, shall be
made public. Testimony and other evidence presented to the Commission is privileged in any
action for defamation. At least five eight members of the Commission must concur in any
recommendation to issue a public reprimand, censure, suspend, or remove any judge. A
respondent who is recommended for public reprimand, censure, suspension, or removal is
entitled to a copy of the proposed record to be filed with the Supreme Court, and if the respondent
has objections to it, to have the record settled by the Commission's chair. The respondent is also
entitled to present a brief and to argue the respondent's case, in person and through counsel, to
the Supreme Court. A majority of the members of the Supreme Court voting must concur in any
order of public reprimand, censure, suspension, or removal. The Supreme Court may approve the
recommendation, remand for further proceedings, or reject the recommendation. A justice of the
House Bill 1236-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Supreme Court or a member of the Commission who is a judge is disqualified from acting in any
case in which he is a respondent.
(a6) Upon issuance of a public reprimand, censure, suspension, or removal by the Supreme
Court, the notice and statement of charges filed by the Commission along with the answer and
all other pleadings, and recommendations of the Commission to the Supreme Court along with
the record filed in support of such recommendations, are no longer confidential.
…."

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act becomes effective only if the constitutional
amendment proposed by Section 1 of this act is approved. If the constitutional amendment is
approved, Section 2 of this act becomes effective January 1, 2027. The remainder of this act is
effective when it becomes law.
Page 4 House Bill 1236-First Edition